District of Columbia statutes.
28-4806.02

Application of chapter to existing trusts and estates.

This chapter applies to every trust or decedent’s estate existing on the effective date of this chapter [April 27, 2001] except as otherwise expressly provided in the will or terms of the trust or in this chapter.

Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-292, § 502(c), 48 DCR 2087
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 605 of the Uniform Principal and Income Act (1997 Act).